Missouri, session 2026, HB2084.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 452.335, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 452.335, to read as follows:
452.335. 1. In a proceeding for nonretroactive invalidity, dissolution of marriage or
legal separation, or a proceeding for maintenance following dissolution of the marriage by a
court which lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse, the court may grant a
maintenance order to either spouse, but only if it finds that the spouse seeking maintenance:
(1) Lacks sufficient property, including marital property apportioned to him or her, to
provide for his or her reasonable needs; and
(2) Is unable to support himself or herself through appropriate employment or is the
custodian of a child whose condition or circumstances make it appropriate that the custodian
not be required to seek employment outside the home.
2. The maintenance order shall be in such amounts and for such periods of time as the
court deems just, and after considering all relevant factors including:
(1) The financial resources of the party seeking maintenance, including marital
property apportioned to him or her, and his or her ability to meet his or her needs
independently, including the extent to which a provision for support of a child living with the
party includes a sum for that party as custodian;
(2) The time necessary to acquire sufficient education or training to enable the party
seeking maintenance to find appropriate employment;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2084 2
(3) The comparative earning capacity of each spouse;
(4) The standard of living established during the marriage;
(5) The obligations and assets, including the marital property apportioned to him or
her and the separate property of each party;
(6) The duration of the marriage;
(7) The age, and the physical and emotional condition of the spouse seeking
maintenance;
(8) The ability of the spouse from whom maintenance is sought to meet his or her
needs while meeting those of the spouse seeking maintenance;
(9) The conduct of the parties during the marriage; and
(10) Any other relevant factors;

provided, however, that the court shall have the authority to set an end date for any
maintenance order granted, whether as part of the original order or as a modification.
Maintenance orders shall end upon the payer reaching full retirement age unless
otherwise agreed to by both parties. For the purposes of this subsection, "full
retirement age" means the earlier of the date on which the payer is eligible for, or begins
receiving, full retirement benefits under the federal Social Security Act, but "full
retirement age" shall not mean "early retirement age" as defined under the federal
Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C Section 416, as amended. The payer shall provide the
payee reasonable notice in advance of retirement. Six months' notice shall be presumed
to be reasonable.
3. The maintenance order shall state if it is modifiable or nonmodifiable. The court
may order maintenance which includes a termination date. Unless the maintenance order
which includes a termination date is nonmodifiable, the court may order the maintenance
decreased, increased, terminated, extended, or otherwise modified based upon a substantial
and continuing change of circumstances which occurred prior to the termination date of the
original order.
✔